New Jersey, session 221, S2897.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 42 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 42 Natural Resource Management STATE AID 21-4895  Natural Resources Engineering .............................. $500,000 Total State Aid appropriation, Natural Resources Management ......................... $500,000 State Aid: 21    Township of Fairfield (Essex County) Passaic River Dredging and Restoration Project..................................................... ($500,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Township of Fairfield (Essex County) Passaic River Dredging and Restoration Project shall be allocated to the Township of Fairfield (Essex County) for its dredging and restoration of the Passaic River.  The Township of Fairfield (Essex County) Passaic River Dredging and Restoration Project shall include the dredging, restoration, cleaning, desnagging, and any other purpose or activity consistent with the Statewide general permit issued for the dredging and restoration of the Passaic River, and provided for in the municipalitys plan submitted to the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. The Township of Fairfield in Essex County shall file a plan on a form prescribed by the commissioner, including such information as the commissioner may deem necessary.  The Department of Environmental Protection shall waive any permit fee for any activity consistent with the Statewide general permit issued for the dredging and restoration of the Passaic River, and provided for in the municipalitys plan submitted to the commissioner. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.